Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.021

Public property subject to rates and charges for stormwater control facilities.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity and public property, including the state of Washington and state property, shall be subject to rates and charges for stormwater control facilities to the same extent private persons and private property are subject to such rates and charges that are imposed by cities and towns pursuant to RCW 35.92.020. In setting these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream improvements or donation of property.

[ 1986 c 278 s 56; 1983 c 315 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 278: See note following RCW 36.01.010.

Severability—1983 c 315: See note following RCW 90.03.500.

Flood control zone districts—Stormwater control improvements: Chapter 86.15 RCW.

Rates and charges for stormwater control facilities—Limitations—Definitions: RCW 90.03.500 through 90.03.525. See also RCW 35.67.025, 36.89.085, and 36.94.145.